Utah statutes.
34A-6-306.   Disclosure of trade secrets -- Protective orders.

(1)  All information reported to or otherwise obtained by the administrator or the administrator's representatives or any employee in connection with any inspection or proceeding under this chapter which contains or which might reveal a trade secret shall be considered confidential except that the information may be disclosed to other officers or employees concerned with carrying out this chapter or when relevant, in any proceeding under this chapter.

(2)  In any such proceeding, the commission or the court shall issue appropriate orders to protect the trade secret.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 375, 1997 General Session

